Tennessee, session 114, HB1186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-106(a), is amended by deleting
the language "Not less than thirty (30) days" and substituting "Not less than twenty-one (21)
days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1186
003125
- 1 -